Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 4. Road Maintenance Service Areas.

Sec. 19.30.260.
Purpose.

The purpose of AS

19.30.260

—

19.30.320

is to facilitate funding for the upgrading, reconstruction, rehabilitation, or paving of existing subdivision roads within a road maintenance service area established under AS

29.35.450

or under a home rule charter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 1984; am § 47 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 19.30.270.
Allocation of money.

During each fiscal year each municipality shall receive money from the department that has been appropriated or otherwise designated for expenditure for road improvements within the municipality, based on the total road mileage in each road maintenance service area in the municipality. The amounts that are available shall be distributed pro rata among eligible municipalities.

Money allocated to a municipality under this section shall be disbursed by the municipality for road maintenance service areas based on a first come, first served priority of road maintenance service area applications, subject to a 50 percent match by each road maintenance service area.

Money allocated under this section shall be available for expenditure in the road maintenance service area for which the funds are authorized for a period of five years after the end of the fiscal year for which the funds are authorized. Money allocated for a road maintenance service area that is unexpended and unobligated at the end of the five-year period shall be used for other road maintenance service areas in the same municipality in accordance with AS

19.30.260

—

19.30.320

. If there are no other road maintenance service areas in the municipality for which the money can be used, the municipality shall remit the unexpended and unobligated money to the department and it shall lapse into the general fund.

Fifty percent of the cost of construction in a road maintenance service area shall be paid by the road maintenance service area through road improvement district assessments, grants, or other appropriate financing means.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 1984)

Sec. 19.30.280.
Eligibility.

After establishing a road maintenance service area under AS

29.35.450

, or under a home rule charter, a municipality may apply to the department for a grant as money is available for road improvements, subject to regulations adopted by the department to carry out the provisions of AS

19.30.260

—

19.30.320

. The department shall require a municipality to submit a five-year plan for the upgrading, reconstructing, rehabilitating, or paving of maintenance service area roads for approval before October 1 of each fiscal year.

A municipality shall establish design standards for construction in a road maintenance service area. An application for a grant for improving an existing road under this section which is constructed after July 1, 1984, may not be granted by the department until the existing road meets the minimum design standards of the municipality.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 1984; am § 48 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 19.30.290.
Administration.

A contract entered into by a municipality for road construction within a road maintenance service area for which funds allocated to the municipality under AS

19.30.260

—

19.30.320

are used shall be awarded only on the basis of the lowest responsible bid by a bidder meeting established criteria of responsibility.

Construction under AS

19.30.260

—

19.30.320

shall be administered by the municipality in which the road maintenance service area is located.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 1984)

Sec. 19.30.300.
Maintenance.

The road maintenance service area shall be responsible for maintaining roads constructed under AS

19.30.260

—

19.30.320

.
The road maintenance service area may contract with a municipality for maintenance of the roads.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 1984)

Sec. 19.30.310.
Report.

No later than August 1 of each year, a municipality that has received money under AS

19.30.270

shall submit a report to the department showing the use of the money by the municipality during the preceding fiscal year.
No later than December 1 of each year, the department shall prepare and submit to the governor a report showing the use of the money allocated under AS

19.30.270

during the preceding fiscal year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 1984)

Sec. 19.30.320.
Definitions.

In AS

19.30.260

—

19.30.320

,

“construction” or “road improvement” has the meaning given in AS

19.59.001

and includes utility and drainage costs but excludes financial costs, right-of-way costs, and new road construction;

“municipality” means a municipality that has road construction or maintenance powers;

“subdivision” has the meaning given in AS

40.15.900

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 56 SLA 1984; am § 53 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 40 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1995, in paragraph (4) [now (3)], “AS

40.15.290

” was substituted for “AS

40.15.190

(2)” to reflect the 1988 renumbering of AS

40.15.190

. In 2008, in paragraph (1), “AS

19.59.001

” was substituted for “AS

19.45.001

” to reflect the 2008 renumbering of AS

19.45.001

. In 2008, the paragraphs were renumbered to reflect the 1996 repeal of former paragraph (2).